Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-243
Authority; agricultural projects; powers.

Prior to exercising any of the powers conferred by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act regarding agricultural projects as defined in subdivision (2) of section 58-219, the authority may, but need not:

(1) Require that the loan involved be insured by a loan insurer or be guaranteed by a loan guarantor;

(2) Require any type of security that it deems reasonable and necessary; or

(3) Authorize the reservation of funds by lenders in such amount and subject to such conditions as the authority considers reasonable and necessary.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 43;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 44.